Louisiana, session 2026, HB1107.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 905.5.1(C) and 924(introductory
paragraph) are hereby amended and reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Articles
905.5.1(I), 924(7) through (9), and 926.5 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 905.5.1. Intellectual disability
* * *
C.(1)(a) Any defendant in a capital case making a claim of who claims the
existence of an intellectual disability shall prove the allegation all of the following
by a preponderance of the clear and convincing evidence.:
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2456 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1107
(i) The defendant has significantly subaverage intellectual functioning with
consideration of the margin of error when evaluating the defendant's intelligence
quotient test score.
(ii) The defendant has significant and substantial deficits in adaptive
behavior.
(iii) Both the significantly subaverage intellectual functioning and the
substantial deficits in adaptive behavior manifested before the defendant reached the
age of eighteen years.
(iv) Both the significantly subaverage intellectual functioning and substantial
deficits in adaptive behavior exist concurrently.
(b) A defendant shall prove all of the criteria provided in Subparagraph (1)
of this Paragraph in order to be considered intellectually disabled.
(2) The jury shall try the issue of intellectual disability of a capital defendant
during the capital sentencing hearing unless the state and the defendant agree that the
issue is to be tried by the judge. If the state and the defendant agree, the issue of
intellectual disability of a capital defendant may be tried prior to trial by the judge
alone.
(2) (3) Any pretrial determination by the judge that a defendant does not
have an intellectual disability shall not preclude the defendant from raising the issue
at the penalty phase, nor shall it preclude any instruction to the jury pursuant to this
Article.
* * *
I. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, this Article
shall become inoperative immediately upon, and to the extent permitted by, a
decision of the Supreme Court of the United States overruling Atkins v. Virginia, 536
U.S. 304 (2002), thereby restoring this state with the authority to impose or carry out
a sentence of death notwithstanding a claim of intellectual disability.
* * *
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2456 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1107
Art. 924. Definitions
As used in this Title, the following terms have the following meanings:
* * *
(7) "Adaptive behavior" means the effectiveness or degree to which the
petitioner meets developmental and sociocultural standards for personal
independence and social responsibility that, without ongoing support, limit the
functioning of the petitioner in one or more activities of daily living that include but
are not limited to communication, social participation, and independent living across
multiple environments such as home, school, work, and the community.
(8) "Intellectually disabled" means a condition that occurred before the
petitioner reached eighteen years of age, is based on a mental deficit that involves
significantly subaverage intellectual functioning, and exists concurrently with
significant impairment in adaptive behavior.
(9) "Significantly subaverage intellectual functioning" means an intelligence
quotient of seventy or below.
* * *
Art. 926.5. Determination of intellectual disability in capital cases; post-conviction
relief
A. In State v. Williams, 2001-1650 (La. 11/1/02), 831 So. 2d 835, the
Louisiana Supreme Court created a test for applying a determination of intellectual
disability in Atkins v. Virginia, 536 U.S. 304 (2002) absent legislative guidance. In
State v. Dunn, 2007-0878 (La. 1/25/08), 974 So. 2d 658, the Louisiana Supreme
Court held that, notwithstanding Article 905.5.1, Williams still applied to all claims
of intellectual disability raised post-trial pursuant to Atkins. As provided in this
Article, the legislature unambiguously overrules both Dunn and Williams to the
extent these cases conflict with this Article.
B. No person found to be intellectually disabled pursuant to this Article shall
be subjected to a sentence of death.
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2456 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1107
C.(1) To obtain relief pursuant to this Article, a petitioner shall prove all of
the following by clear and convincing evidence:
(a) The petitioner has significantly subaverage intellectual functioning.
(b) The petitioner has significant and substantial deficits in adaptive
behavior.
(c) Both the significantly subaverage intellectual functioning and the
substantial deficits in adaptive behavior manifested before the petitioner reached
eighteen years of age.
(d) Both the significantly subaverage intellectual functioning and substantial
deficits in adaptive behavior exist concurrently.
(2) A petitioner shall prove all of the criteria provided in Subparagraph (1)
of this Paragraph to be considered intellectually disabled.
D.(1) To prove significantly subaverage intellectual functioning for post-
conviction relief, the petitioner shall submit a written expert report at least thirty
days before the state files procedural objections and, upon a finding of good cause
by the court, at least sixty days before any hearing on the merits. The expert report
shall contain a determination of the petitioner's intelligence quotient.
(2) The court shall consider the margin of error when evaluating a
petitioner's intelligence quotient test score; however, the court shall not presume that
an intelligence quotient score falls in the bottom of the error range.
(3) The court shall consider the cumulative effects of multiple scores and
also scores of adaptive behavior when the petitioner has an intelligence quotient
ranging from seventy-five through eighty. The court shall presume that higher
intelligence quotient scores more accurately reflect a person's capacity. A score
above eighty on any scientifically recognized, standardized intelligence quotient test
that is individually administered by a licensed psychiatrist or psychologist creates an
irrebuttable presumption that the petitioner does not have significantly subaverage
intellectual functioning.
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2456 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1107
(4) The expert report provided in Subparagraph (1) of this Paragraph is
subject to the criteria for use of expert evidence as set forth by the Supreme Court
of the United States in Daubert vs. Merrell Dow Pharmaceuticals, 509 U.S. 579
(1993) and the Louisiana Supreme Court in State v. Foret, 628 So. 2d 1116 (La.
1993).
(5) A petitioner who, on the sole basis of a written expert report, is unable
to prove subaverage intellectual functioning by clear and convincing evidence shall
not be granted an evidentiary hearing on his claim of intellectual disability.
E. Any evidentiary hearing, if applicable, shall be conducted in accordance
with Article 930.
F. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, Article
905.5.1 shall become inoperative immediately upon, and to the extent permitted by,
a decision of the Supreme Court of the United States overruling Atkins v. Virginia,
536 U.S. 304 (2002), thereby restoring this state with the authority to impose or carry
out a sentence of death notwithstanding a claim of intellectual disability.
G. Any civil action seeking declaratory, injunctive, or other relief
challenging the constitutionality of this Article, in whole or in part, shall be brought
exclusively by ordinary proceeding in the Twenty-First Judicial District Court.
H. This Article applies both retroactively and prospectively to all post-
conviction relief that is sought on the basis of the petitioner's intellectual disability.
I. This Article applies only to claims of intellectual disability that are raised
in post-conviction proceedings for capital cases. Nothing in this Article shall be
construed to control, limit, expand, or otherwise affect any of the following:
(1) The meaning of disability, intellectual disability, or any related term.
(2) Any right, protection, benefit, or eligibility determination under any other
provision of state or federal law.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
renumber the Subparagraphs of Code of Criminal Procedure Article 924 so as to properly
place Code of Criminal Procedure Article 924(7) through (9) as enacted by this Act.
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2456 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1107